Connecticut, session 2026, SB00445.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (c) and (d) of section 2-79a of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(c) [On or before the second Wednesday after the convening of the
regular session of the General Assembly in 2020, and every four years
thereafter on such second Wednesday, the commission shall submit to
the General Assembly a report which lists] The commission shall
maintain on the commission's Internet web site a record of each existing
state mandate, as defined in subsection (a) of section 2-32b. [, and which
(1) categorizes] Such record shall categorize each mandate as
constitutional, statutory or executive, and [(2) describes] describe the
potential impacts on local governments implementing the mandate. [In
each report the commission may also make recommendations on state
mandates for consideration by the commission. On and after October 1,
1996, the report shall be submitted to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
appropriations and budgets of state agencies, to any other joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance and, upon
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 445
request, to any member of the General Assembly. A summary of the
report shall be submitted to each member of the General Assembly if the
summary is two pages or less and a notification of the report shall be
submitted to each member if the summary is more than two pages.
Submission shall be by mailing the report, summary or notification to
the legislative address of each member of the committees or the General
Assembly, as applicable. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to prevent the commission from making more frequent
recommendations on state mandates.]
(d) [Commencing on or before January 15, 1997, and every year] Not
later than January 15, 2027, and not less than every two years thereafter,
[except a year in which a report is filed pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section,] the commission shall [submit to the General Assembly a
supplement to the report required in said subsection identifying any
new mandates adopted and any mandates changed in the previous
year] select not fewer than three state mandates, as defined in section 2-
32b, from the record maintained pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, pertaining to municipalities or school districts, and create a
report (1) analyzing the net additional cost or savings to municipalities
or school districts realized as a result of each such mandate, (2)
describing any efficiencies or difficulties arising from each such
mandate, and (3) recommending any modifications to or the repeal of
each such mandate, as applicable. The commission shall publish such
report on the commission's Internet web site. The provisions of this
subsection shall not be construed to prevent the commission from
making more frequent recommendations concerning state mandates.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 2-79a(c) and (d)
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2